Hawaii statutes.
[§52D-16] Domestic violence
policies; standard of conduct policies. Each county police department
shall post its policies relating to domestic violence, officer-involved
domestic violence, and standards of conduct on its official website. [L 2015, c
30, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next